src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun stems
!  -----
!! Only a handful of words so far.

LEXICON Nouns
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
vatu inal "head" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
vakili al "canoe" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
pi inal "marble" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
letau inal "woman" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
lohon inal "child" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
